Utah statutes.
15-6-4.   Disputed payments excepted.

If the agency fails to pay the amount due on time because of a dispute between the agency and the business over the amount due or over compliance with the contract, the provisions of this chapter do not apply.



Amended by Chapter 79, 1989 General Session

